Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 8. Anatomical Gifts and Organ Transportation

History.

2021 ch. 35, § 1, effective March 30, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 35, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 30, 2021.

§ 26-20-801.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Covered person” means a policyholder, subscriber, enrollee, member or individual covered by any policy, contract or certificate listed in W.S. 26-20-802(a);

“Health insurance issuer” means an entity subject to the insurance laws and regulations of this state, or subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner, that contracts or offers to contract to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services, including through a policy, contract or certificate listed in W.S. 26-20-802(a), and shall include a sickness and accident insurance company, a nonprofit corporation, a health maintenance organization, a preferred provider organization, or any similar entity, or any other entity providing a plan of health insurance or health benefits.

The definitions in W.S.

35-5-301

shall apply to this article.

History.

2021 ch. 35, § 1, effective March 30, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 35, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 30, 2021.

§ 26-20-802.
Discrimination prohibited.

No individual or group health insurance policy providing coverage on an expense incurred basis, individual or group service or indemnity type health insurance contract or certificate issued by any health insurance issuer that provides coverage for anatomical gifts, organ transplants or related treatment and services shall:

Deny coverage of an anatomical gift, organ transplant or related treatment or service to a covered person solely on the basis of the person's disability;

Deny to a covered person eligibility, or continued eligibility, to enroll or to renew coverage under the terms of the policy, contract or certificate, solely for the purpose of avoiding the requirements of this section or W.S. 35 5 301 through

35-5-303

;

Penalize or otherwise reduce or limit the reimbursement of an attending provider, or provide monetary or nonmonetary incentives to an attending provider, to induce the provider to provide care to a covered person in a manner inconsistent with this section or W.S.

35-5-301

through

35-5-303

; or

Reduce or limit coverage benefits to a covered person for the medical services or other services related to organ transplantation performed pursuant to this section and W.S.

35-5-301

through 35-5-303 as determined in consultation with the attending physician and covered person.

In the case of any policy, contract or certificate listed in subsection (a) of this section that is maintained pursuant to one (1) or more collective bargaining agreements between employee representatives and one (1) or more employers, any policy, contract or certificate amendment made pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement relating to the policy and made solely to conform to any requirement under this section shall not be treated as a termination of the collective bargaining agreement.

Nothing in this section shall require a health insurance issuer to provide coverage for a medically inappropriate organ transplant.

History.

2021 ch. 35, § 1, effective March 30, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 35, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 30, 2021.